Wisconsin, session 2025, AB1062.
do enact as follows:AB1062,13Section 1. 19.45 (8m) of the statutes is created to read:AB1062,1,4419.45 (8m) (a) In this subsection:AB1062,2,111. “Commissioner” means a commissioner of the public service commission.AB1062,2,222. “Public utility” has the meaning given in s. 196.01 (5).AB1062,2,333. “Transmission company” has the meaning given in s. 196.485 (1) (ge).AB1062,2,94(b) No former commissioner, for 36 months following the date on which he or 5she ceases to be a commissioner, may engage in employment for compensation with 6an investor-owned public utility or a transmission company if the former 7commissioner’s employment duties for the public utility or transmission company 8include policy making or executive decision-making, operations management, or 9government relations.AB1062,210Section 2. Initial applicability.AB1062,2,1311(1) This act first applies retroactively to a person who ceases to be a 12commissioner of the public service commission during the 12 months immediately 13preceding the effective date of this subsection.AB1062,2,1414